morph_analyzers/TRmorph/analyzer.cpp.lexc
!
! Thigs that do not fit any lexicon, or not analyzed because of
! unhandled exeptions go here.
!
! In time the patterns here should turn into rules/exceptions 
! in the description.
!
LEXICON Exceptions
de%<V%>%<cv%:ip%>%<Adv%>:deyip     #;
!
! the following are from the STD project
!   they are at least harmless to keep here. 
!
! şey%<disc_part%>            #;
! tıh%<ui%>                   #;
! hı%<bch%>                   #;
! hıı%<bch%>                  #;
! hı-hı%<bch%>                #;
! hı-hıı%<bch%>               #;
! hıı-hı%<bch%>               #;
! hm%<bch%>                   #;
! hmm%<bch%>                  #;
! hm-hm%<bch%>                #;
! hm-hmm%<bch%>               #;
! hmm-hmm%<bch%>              #;
! ha%<bch%>                   #;
! haa%<bch%>                  #;
! ha-ha%<bch%>                #;
! ha-haa%<bch%>               #;
! haa-haa%<bch%>              #;
! he%<bch%>                   #;
! hee%<bch%>                  #;
! he-he%<bch%>                #;
! he-hee%<bch%>               #;
! hee-hee%<bch%>              #;
! he% ya%<bch%>               #;
! ha% ya%<bch%>               #;
! ya%<bch%>                   #;
! yaa%<bch%>                  #;
! cık%<ngtv%>%<bch%>          #;
! e%<pau%>                    #;
! em%<pau%>                   #;
! ee%<pau%>                   #;
! eem%<pau%>                  #;
! emm%<pau%>                  #;
! he% ya%<bch%>               #;



! This file is part of TRmorph.
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!
!
! This lexicon common typos for all word classes.
! It will be included in the resulting automata if the option
! 1 is enabled.
!
! The continuation lexicon should be prefixed with '_typo', so that 
! we can mark these as ':typo' in the analyzer output.
!

Kürt^sVC:Kürd       NP_typo;
tabii:tabi          Adj_typo;
tabii:tabi          Adv_typo;
diyalog             N_typo; ! normally dialo^g (inflects dialoğu)
mütalaa:mütala      N_typo;
konservatuvar:konservatuar  N_typo;
laboratuvar:laboratuar      N_typo;
bir:bi              DetIndef_typo;
bir:bi              Num_typo;



!
! Include the definition of morphological process
!


! morph.lexc - main morphotactic description
!
! Released under the terms of the MIT License
! Copyright (c) 2011-2015 Çağrı Çöltekin <cagri@coltekin.net>
! 
! Permission is hereby granted, free of charge, to any person obtaining a
! copy of this software and associated documentation files (the "Software"),
! to deal in the Software without restriction, including without limitation
! the rights to use, copy, modify, merge, publish, distribute, sublicense,
! and/or sell copies of the Software, and to permit persons to whom the
! Software is furnished to do so, subject to the following conditions:
! 
! The above copyright notice and this permission notice shall be included in
! all copies or substantial portions of the Software.
! 
! THE SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED "AS IS", WITHOUT WARRANTY OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR
! IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO THE WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY,
! FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE AND NONINFRINGEMENT. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE
! AUTHORS OR COPYRIGHT HOLDERS BE LIABLE FOR ANY CLAIM, DAMAGES OR OTHER
! LIABILITY, WHETHER IN AN ACTION OF CONTRACT, TORT OR OTHERWISE, ARISING
! FROM, OUT OF OR IN CONNECTION WITH THE SOFTWARE OR THE USE OR OTHER
! DEALINGS IN THE SOFTWARE.
!





   




   





   




   



   




   




   




   



   



   



   




   



   


   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   




   





   





   




   





   


Multichar_Symbols ^A ^I ^K ^C ^c ^p ^k ^D ^t ^g ^G
                  ^(A) ^(I) ^(s) ^(n) ^(y) ^(ş)
                  ^pA ^pI ^pO ^pU ^pÂ ^pÔ ^pÛ ^pÎ
                  @RB @MB @dB
                  @APOS @ABBR
                  @M @MREDUP
                  @tSep @dSep
                  @RomNum
                  @NCOMP
                  @PRN
                  @DEL@ @DUP@ @DELS@
                  @LN @LN2 @CAUS
                  @miSPC @opt3
                  ^NS ^NNS ^S
                  ^sFUV ^sFRV ^sBUV ^sBRV ^sVC ^sUC
!                   e,i   ü,ö   a,ı   o,u   


! LEXICON Root
! Number; ! numbers are special as they are defined through a set of rules.
! Exceptions;
! 
!
! This part is the core lexicon. We do not what to leave any
! of these out. These files do not have lexicon definitions. 
! They only list the lexical items and their class.
!
! #include "lexicon/alpha"
! #include "lexicon/clitics"
! #include "lexicon/punctuation"
! #include "lexicon/qwords"
! #include "lexicon/adjective"
! #include "lexicon/adverb"
! #include "lexicon/conjunction"
! #include "lexicon/determiner"
! #include "lexicon/interjection"
! #include "lexicon/noun"
! #include "lexicon/proper_noun"
! #include "lexicon/onomatopoeia"
! #include "lexicon/postposition"
! #include "lexicon/pronoun"
! #include "lexicon/verb"
! 
! !
! ! These may be "optionalized", or replaced by a more rule-governed
! ! method in the future.
! !
! 
! #include "lexicon/abbreviation"
! #include "lexicon/part_word"
! 
! 
! !
! ! Definitions for numbers, including numeric forms (Arabic and Roman numerals)
! !
! 
! #include "number.lexc"
! #include "exceptions.lexc"


!
! Continuation class for symbols of the alphabet (when they are used
! literally)
!
! when inflected, we require apostrophe after letters (when required
! for porper names), e.g., 'şekil A'da görüldüğü gibi'.
!
LEXICON AlphaCont
%<Alpha%>:@RB   NPApos;
%<Alpha%>:@RB   ENDLEX;


!
! conjunctions
!

LEXICON CnjCoo
%<Cnj%:coo%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON CnjAdv
%<Cnj%:adv%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON CnjSub
%<Cnj%:sub%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

!
! The following are for multi-word or discontinuous conjunctions.
!
LEXICON CnjCooPart
%<Cnj%:coo%:partial%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

LEXICON CnjAdvPart
%<Cnj%:adv%:partial%>:@RB      ENDLEX;

!
! Postpositions
!

!
! non-case-marked complements
!

LEXICON nomPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:nomC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        nomPostP;

LEXICON nomPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON nomPostPadjKi
%<Postp%:adj%:nomC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        nomPostPKi;

LEXICON nomPostPKi
%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:@RB    AdvCont;
%<Postp%:adv%:nomC%>:@RB    Ki;

!
! genitive complements (note: this is different than the nominal
! complement case, where they are fine with genitive pronouns, but no
! other genitive complements)
!

LEXICON genPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:genC%>:@RB    AdvCont;


!
! accusative complements
!
LEXICON accPostPadj
%<Postp%:adv%:accC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                            accPostP;

LEXICON accPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:accC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

!
! dative complements
!

LEXICON datPostPadj
%<Postp%:adj%:datC%>:@RB    AdjCont;
                        datPostP;

LEXICON datPostP
%<Postp%:adv%:datC%>:@RB    AdvCont;

LEXICON Root
aslında             CnjAdv;
hoş                 CnjAdv;
pekâlâ              CnjAdv;
ama                 CnjAdv;
ama                 CnjCoo;
ancak               CnjCoo;
bˈari                CnjAdv;
bˈelki               CnjAdv;
bile                CnjAdv;
bir% de             CnjAdv;
bir% de             CnjCoo;
bunun% üzerine      CnjAdv;
çˈünkü               CnjCoo;
da                  CnjSub;
de                  CnjSub;
daha% doğrusu       CnjAdv;
değil               CnjCoo;
diğer% taraftan     CnjAdv;
fakat               CnjCoo;
gerek               CnjCoo;
gerekse             CnjCoo; ! TODO: this may have a better analysis
ha                  CnjCoo;
hani                CnjAdv;
hem                 CnjCoo;
için                CnjCoo;
ila                 CnjCoo;
ile                 CnjCoo;
işte                CnjAdv;
ister               CnjCoo;
kah                 CnjCoo;
ki                  CnjAdv;
lâkin               CnjAdv;
lˈakin               CnjCoo;
mˈeğer               CnjAdv;
nˈasıl% ki           CnjAdv;
ne                  CnjCoo;
neyse               CnjAdv;
ˈörneğin             CnjAdv;
ˈoysa% ki            CnjAdv;
sˈonra               CnjAdv;
sözgelişi           CnjAdv;
tersine             CnjAdv;
ve                  CnjCoo;
velev% ki           CnjAdv;
veya                CnjCoo;
veyˈahut             CnjCoo;
ya                  CnjAdv;
ya                  CnjCoo;
ya% da              CnjCoo;
yani                CnjAdv;
yok% mu             CnjAdv;
yˈoksa               CnjCoo;
yok:yo              CnjAdv;
diye                CnjSub;
ki                  CnjSub;
eğer                CnjSub;
şˈayet               CnjSub;
madem                CnjSub;
mademki              CnjSub;
kâh                 CnjAdvPart;
ya                  CnjCooPart;
da                  CnjCooPart;
de                  CnjCoo;
da                  CnjCoo;
de                  CnjCooPart;
hem                 CnjAdv;
gibi                            nomPostPadj;
için                            nomPostP;
ile                             nomPostP;
kadar                           nomPostPadjKi;
dahi                            nomPostP;
boyu                            nomPostP;   ! gün boyu
dahil                           nomPostP;
dâhil                           nomPostP;
kala                            nomPostP;
geçe                            nomPostP;
üzere                           nomPostP;
ˈöncesi                          nomPostP;  ! yemek öncesi/sonrası
sˈonrası                         nomPostP;
dolayısıyla                     nomPostP;   ! tören dolayısıyla -- not in G&K
yanısıra                        genPostP;   
diye                            nomPostPadj;
halinde                         nomPostP;
takdirde                        nomPostP;
nezdinde                        nomPostP;
yerde                           nomPostP;
durumunda                       nomPostP;
nispette                        nomPostP;
oranda                          nomPostP;
ölçude                          nomPostP;
zaman                           nomPostP;
göre                            datPostPadj; ! bana göre kitap
rˈağmen                          datPostP;
karşın                          datPostP;
değin                           datPostP;
ait                             datPostPadj;
dair                            datPostPadj;
ilişkin                         datPostPadj;
yönelik                         datPostPadj;
yakın                           datPostPadj; ! iki bine yakın aile --not in G&K
atfen                           datPostP;
binˈaen                          datPostP;
hitaben                         datPostP;
ilaveten                        datPostP;
istinaden                       datPostP;
ithafen                         datPostP;
mahsˈuben                        datPostP;
nˈazaran                         datPostP;
aşkın                           accPostPadj;
takiben                         accPostP;
lakin               CnjAdv;
kah                 CnjAdvPart;
dahil                           nomPostP;
